Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-1014
National flood insurance program, defined.

National flood insurance program shall mean the program authorized by the United States Congress under the National Flood Insurance Act of 1968, as amended, 42 U.S.C., 4001 to 4128.

Laws 1983, LB 35, § 14.